fi: Uimisen harjoittelun keskittymiskohde: Vetopituuden parantaminen; Vastus; Varhainen pystysuora kyynärvarsi; Kestävyys; Lihasten eristäminen; Etenemisvoima; Voiman kehittäminen; Uintitekniikan korjaaminen; Tekniikka; Ylävartalon voima; Muu
bg-BG: Фокус на тренировката по плуване: Подобряване на дистанцията при загребване; Съпротивление на водата; Ранен вертикален захват (EVF); Издръжливост; Изолация на мускулите; Мощно задвижване; Изграждане на сила; Корекция на стила; Техника; Сила на горната част на тялото; Друго
pl: Zakres treningu pływackiego: Poprawa odległości na jedno pociągnięcie; Opór wody; Wczesny chwyt wody (EVF); Wytrzymałość; Izolacja mięśni; Siła napędowa; Budowa siły; Korekta stylu; Technika; Siła górnej części ciała; Inny
sl-SI: Fokus plavalnega treninga: Izboljšanje razdalje na zavesljaj; Upor pri plavanju; Zgodnji vertikalni podlaket (EVF); Vzdržljivost; Izolacija mišic; Moč potiska; Povečanje moči; Popravljanje zavesljajev; Tehnika; Moč zgornjega dela telesa; Drugo
pt-BR: Foco no treinamento de natação: Melhoria de distância por braçada; Resistência ao arrasto; Antebraço vertical antecipado; Resistência; Isolamento muscular; Propulsão de força; Fortalecimento; Correção de braçada; Técnica; Força na parte superior do corpo; Outro
ko: 수영 훈련 핵심 영역: 스트로크당 거리 향상; 항력 저항; 얼리 버티컬 포어암; 지구력; 근육 고립; 파워 추진력; 근력 강화; 스트로크 교정; 기술; 상체 파워; 기타
hu: Úszástanulási fókusz: Csapáshossz növelése; Ellenállásos (fékező); Korai függőleges alkar (EVF); Állóképesség; Izomizoláció; Erő/Hajtóerő; Erőfejlesztés; Úszótechnika javítása; Technika; Felsőtest ereje; Egyéb
de: Schwerpunkt des Schwimmtrainers: Verbesserung der Distanz pro Zug; Wasserwiderstand; Hoher Ellenbogen (EVF); Ausdauer; Muskelisolation; Antriebskraft; Kraftaufbau; Technikkorrektur; Technik; Oberkörperkraft; Sonstige
fr: Points forts de l'entraînement de natation: Amélioration de la distance par mouvement; Résistance à la traînée; Prise d’eau verticale; Endurance; Isolation musculaire; Puissance de propulsion; Développement de la force; Correction de la nage; Technique; Puissance du haut du corps; Autre
sv: Simträning – fokusområde: Förbättrad distans per simtag; Motståndsträning; Tidig vertikal underarm; Uthållighet; Muskelisolering; Kraft och framdrivning; Styrkeuppbyggnad; Simtagskorrigering; Teknik; Överkroppsstyrka; Annat
lt-LT: Plaukimo treniruočių fokusas: Atstumo per vieną yri gerinimas; Pasipriešinimas vandeniui; Ankstyvas vertikalus dilbis; Ištvermė; Raumenų izoliacija; Traukos jėga; Jėgos stiprinimas; Yrio korekcija; Technika; Viršutinės kūno dalies jėga; Kita
cs: Zaměření plaveckého tréninku: Prodloužení plaveckého kroku; Zvýšení odporu; Předčasné vertikální předloktí; Vytrvalost; Izolace svalů; Zvýšení hnací síly; Budování síly; Korekce techniky plavání; Technika; Síla horní části těla; Jiné
es: Foco de entrenamiento de natación: Mejora de distancia por brazada; Resistencia al arrastre; Antebrazo vertical temprano; Resistencia; Aislamiento muscular; Potencia y propulsión; Desarrollo de fuerza; Corrección de brazada; Técnica; Potencia del tren superior; Otro
pt-PT: Objetivo de treino de natação: Melhoria de distância por braçada; Resistência ao atrito; Antebraço vertical precoce; Resistência; Isolamento muscular; Propulsão de força; Desenvolvimento de força; Correção de braçada; Técnica; Força do tronco; Outro
ja: スイムトレーニングフォーカス: ストローク距離の向上; 抵抗; アーリーバーティカルフォアアーム; 持久力; 筋肉のアイソレーション; パワーと推進力; 筋力強化; ストロークの修正; テクニック; 上半身のパワー; その他
ru: Фокус тренировки плавания: Увеличение расстояния за гребок; Сопротивление воды; Ранний захват воды предплечьем; Выносливость; Изоляция мышц; Мощность толчка; Развитие силы; Коррекция гребка; Техника; Сила верхней части тела; Другое
ro-RO: Obiectiv al antrenamentului la înot: Îmbunătățirea distanței la fiecare brațadă; Rezistență la înaintare; Antebraț vertical timpuriu; Anduranță; Izolarea mușchilor; Putere de propulsie; Dezvoltarea forței; Corectarea brațadei; Tehnică; Forța părții superioare a corpului; Altele
en: Swim training focus: Distance per stroke improvement; Drag resistance; Early vertical forearm; Endurance; Muscle isolation; Power propulsion; Strength building; Stroke correction; Technique; Upper body power; Other
hr-HR: Fokus treninga plivanja: Poboljšanje udaljenosti po zaveslaju; Otpor u vodi; Rani vertikalni hvat; Izdržljivost; Izolacija mišića; Pogonska snaga; Izgradnja snage; Korekcija zaveslaja; Tehnika; Snaga gornjeg dijela tijela; Ostalo
tr: Yüzme antrenman odağı: Kulaç başı mesafe artırma; Direnç; Erken dikey ön kol (EVF); Dayanıklılık; Kas izolasyonu; İtme gücü; Güç geliştirme; Kulaç düzeltme; Teknik; Üst vücut gücü; Diğer
zh-CN: 游泳训练重点: 提高单次划水距离; 阻力训练; 早期垂直前臂; 耐力; 肌肉分离; 力量推进; 力量建设; 泳姿纠正; 技巧; 上半身力量; 其他
nl: Focus zwemtraining: Verbetering afstand per slag; Weerstand; Early vertical forearm (EVF); Uithoudingsvermogen; Spierisolatie; Krachtpropulsie; Krachttraining; Slagcorrectie; Techniek; Kracht in bovenlichaam; Overig
zh-TW: 游泳訓練重點: 提升單次划水前進距離; 阻力訓練; 高肘抱水 (Early vertical forearm); 耐力; 肌肉孤立訓練; 動力推進; 力量鍛鍊; 泳姿校正; 技巧; 上半身力量; 其他
vi: Trọng tâm bài tập bơi: Cải thiện quãng đường mỗi nhịp bơi; Lực cản nước; Kỹ thuật cẳng tay vuông góc sớm; Sức bền; Phân lập cơ; Lực đẩy; Xây dựng sức mạnh; Chỉnh sửa nhịp bơi; Kỹ thuật; Sức mạnh thân trên; Khác
el: Εστίαση προπόνησης κολύμβησης: Βελτίωση απόστασης ανά χεριά; Αντίσταση έλξης; Πρώιμος κάθετος πήχης; Αντοχή; Μυϊκή απομόνωση; Ισχυρή προώθηση; Ενδυνάμωση; Διόρθωση χεριάς; Τεχνική; Δύναμη άνω κορμού; Άλλο
nb: Fokus for svømmetrening: Forbedring av distanse per tak; Vannmotstand; Tidlig vertikal underarm; Utholdenhet; Muskelisolering; Kraftfremdrift; Styrkebygging; Svømmetakskorrigering; Teknikk; Overkroppsstyrke; Annet
sk-SK: Zameranie na plavecký tréning: Zlepšenie vzdialenosti na jeden záber; Odpor; Včasný vertikálny úchop (Early vertical forearm); Vytrvalosť; Izolácia svalov; Silový pohon; Budovanie sily; Korekcia záberu; Technika; Sila hornej časti tela; Iné
it: Focus dell'allenamento per il nuoto: Miglioramento della distanza per bracciata; Resistenza all'avanzamento; Gomito alto (EVF); Resistenza; Isolamento muscolare; Propulsione di potenza; Potenziamento muscolare; Correzione della bracciata; Tecnica; Potenza della parte superiore del corpo; Altro
th: การฝึกว่ายน้ำเน้นที่การฝึกซ้อม: การเพิ่มระยะทางต่อสโตรค; ฝึกแรงต้านน้ำ; การตั้งแขนในแนวดิ่งเร็ว; ความอดทน; การแยกส่วนกล้ามเนื้อ; พลังขับเคลื่อน; การสร้างความแข็งแกร่ง; การแก้ไขท่าว่ายน้ำ; เทคนิค; พลังของร่างกายส่วนบน; อื่นๆ
da: Svømmetræningsfokus: Forbedring af distance pr. armtag; Trækmodstand; Tidlig vertikal underarm; Udholdenhed; Muskelisolering; Kraftfremdrift; Styrkeopbygning; Korrektion af armtag; Teknik; Overkropsstyrke; Andet